Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Chapter 5 Offenses Against Public Administration

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of attorney for tampering with evidence, 49 ALR5th 619.